Ohio, session 136, HB98.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 3301.25 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 3301.25. (A) The department of education and 6
workforce shall establish the community connectors workforce 7
program to support connecting students to jobs, internships, and 8
career professionals in their communities. 9
(B)(1) The department shall oversee the program, and each 10
educational service center shall administer the program for the 11
school districts that have entered into a contract with the 12
educational service center under division (B) of section 13
3313.843 of the Revised Code. Each educational service center 14
shall, to the extent that funds are appropriated by the general 15
assembly to do so, employ or contract for services with at least 16
one, but not more than three, individuals to work as directors 17
in high schools in the districts that have entered into a 18
contract with the educational service center under division (B) 19

Sub. H. B. No. 98 Page 2
As Re-Referred by the House Rules and Reference Committee
of section 3313.843 of the Revised Code. Each educational 20
service center shall determine the number of directors it 21
employs or contracts with under this section. 22
(2) Educational service centers shall determine any 23
eligibility or application requirements for the directors, 24
however the director shall have experience in job placement, 25
school counseling, or primary and secondary education. 26
(C) Directors identified under division (B) of this 27
section shall do all of the following: 28
(1) Collaborate with local OhioMeansJobs centers and other 29
community partners, as identified by the director, to identify 30
available jobs, apprenticeships, and internships in the 31
community, and engage students in career mentoring with 32
community members; 33
(2) Determine the number of students that may participate 34
in the program at the district or school; 35
(3) Create an application and procedures to apply for the 36
program and, as a part of the application procedures, interview 37
students and administer an aptitude test, as selected by the 38
director, to assess their professional skills to determine a 39
student's eligibility and preparedness to participate in the 40
program; 41
(4) Consider a student's graduation plan developed under 42
section 3313.617 of the Revised Code when placing that student 43
in a job, apprenticeship, or internship through the program; 44
(5) Offer dedicated and regular classroom instruction to 45
the maximum number of students possible in soft skills and 46
professional skills training, including problem-solving, time 47
management, creative and critical thinking, communication and 48

Sub. H. B. No. 98 Page 3
As Re-Referred by the House Rules and Reference Committee
civility, and ethics. If a district or school currently offers 49
similar instruction the director shall collaborate with those 50
instructors, other appropriate school officials that have 51
commensurate experience, and professionals who support the 52
development of career and life pathways in the school. Students 53
may use instruction under division (B)(4) of this section to 54
qualify for the OhioMeansJobs-readiness seal established under 55
section 3313.6112 of the Revised Code. 56
(6) Report to the educational service center that employs 57
or contracts with the director and to the department of 58
education and workforce all of the following: 59
(a) The number of students participating in the program; 60
(b) The number of students who are placed in jobs, 61
apprenticeships, or internships through the program; 62
(c) The number of students who receive soft skills and 63
professional skills training offered by the director. 64
(D) Any business or organization that employs a student 65
through the program shall comply with the applicable minor labor 66
laws prescribed under section 4109.02 of the Revised Code. 67
Section 2. All items in this act are hereby appropriated 68
as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the 69
credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations 70
made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 71
2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. 72
The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to 73
any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 74
Section 3. 75
76

Sub. H. B. No. 98 Page 4
As Re-Referred by the House Rules and Reference Committee
1 2 3 4 5
A EDU DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND WORKFORCE
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 200556 Community Connectors $8,000,000 $8,000,000
Workforce Program
D TOTAL GRF General Revenue Fund $8,000,000 $8,000,000
E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $8,000,000 $8,000,000
COMMUNITY CONNECTORS 77
The foregoing appropriation item 200556, Community 78
Connectors Workforce Program, shall be used for the Community 79
Connectors Workforce Program created in section 3301.25 of the 80
Revised Code. 81
Of the foregoing appropriation item 200556, Community 82
Connectors Workforce Program, $4,000,000 in each fiscal year 83
shall be allocated equally among educational service centers. 84
Of the foregoing appropriation item 200556, Community 85
Connectors Workforce Program, $4,000,000 in each fiscal year 86
shall be allocated to educational service centers in proportion 87
to the number of students in each center's student count 88
calculated under division (G)(1) of section 3313.843 of the 89
Revised Code. 90
Section 4. Within the limits set forth in this act, the 91
Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts 92
indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation 93
made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which 94

Sub. H. B. No. 98 Page 5
As Re-Referred by the House Rules and Reference Committee
appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from 95
operating appropriations contained in this act shall be 96
accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all 97
applicable provisions of, the main operating appropriations act 98
of the 136th General Assembly. 99